cs: Typ tyčového systému: Hliníkové pruty; Karbonové pruty; Sklolaminátové pruty; Nafukovací vzduchové tubusy; Nevyžaduje pruty; Ocelové pruty; Trekové hole (dodané uživatelem); Jiné
fi: Keppijärjestelmän tyyppi: Alumiinitangot; Hiilikuitutangot; Lasikuitutangot; Ilmatäytteiset putket; Ei vaadi tankoja; Terästangot; Vaellussauvat (käyttäjän omat); Muu
da: Type af stangsystem: Aluminiumsstænger; Kulfiberstænger; Glasfiberstænger; Oppustelige luftkanaler; Ingen stænger påkrævet; Stålstænger; Vandrestænger (medfølger ikke); Andet
sk-SK: Typ stĺpového systému: Hliníkové tyče; Tyče z uhlíkových vlákien; Sklolaminátové tyče; Nafukovacie vzduchové trubice; Nevyžadujú sa žiadne tyče; Oceľové tyče; Trekingové palice (vlastné); Iné
es: Tipo de sistema del bastón: Postes de aluminio; Postes de fibra de carbono; Postes de fibra de vidrio; Tubos de aire inflables; No se requieren postes; Postes de acero; Bastones de senderismo (proporcionados por el usuario); Otro
en: Pole system type: Aluminum poles; Carbon fiber poles; Fiberglass poles; Inflatable air tubes; No poles required; Steel poles; Trekking poles (user supplied); Other
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema palic: Aluminijaste palice; Palice iz ogljikovih vlaken; Palice iz steklenih vlaken; Napihljive zračne cevi; Palice niso potrebne; Jeklene palice; Pohodne palice (priskrbi uporabnik); Drugo
zh-TW: 桿柱系統類型: 鋁合金桿; 碳纖維桿; 玻璃纖維桿; 充氣氣管; 無須桿件; 鋼桿; 登山杖 (使用者自備); 其他
nb: Type stavsystem: Aluminiumsstenger; Karbonfiberstenger; Glassfiberstenger; Oppblåsbare luftrør; Ingen stenger nødvendig; Stålstenger; Gåstaver (brukerens egne); Annet
pl: Typ systemu tyczek: Tyczki aluminiowe; Tyczki z włókna węglowego; Tyczki z włókna szklanego; Pompowane tuby powietrzne; Tyczki nie są wymagane; Tyczki stalowe; Kijki trekkingowe (zapewnia użytkownik); Inne
hu: Rúdrendszer típusa: Alumínium rudak; Szénszálas rudak; Üvegszálas rudak; Felfújható légcsövek; Nincs szükség rudakra; Acél rudak; Trekking botok (felhasználó biztosítja); Egyéb
nl: Type stoksysteem: Aluminium stokken; Koolstofvezelstokken; Glasvezelstokken; Opblaasbare luchtslangen; Geen stokken vereist; Stalen stokken; Trekkingstokken (door gebruiker geleverd); Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava stupova: Aluminijske šipke; Šipke od karbonskih vlakana; Šipke od stakloplastike; Zračne cijevi na napuhavanje; Nisu potrebne šipke; Čelične šipke; Štapovi za planinarenje (osigurava korisnik); Ostalo
lt-LT: Kuoliukų sistemos tipas: Aliuminio strypai; Anglies pluošto strypai; Stiklo pluošto strypai; Pripučiami oro vamzdeliai; Strypų nereikia; Plieniniai strypai; Žygio lazdos (pateikia naudotojas); Kita
ro-RO: Tip de sistem de bețe: Bețe din aluminiu; Bețe din fibră de carbon; Bețe din fibră de sticlă; Tuburi de aer gonflabile; Nu necesită bețe; Bețe din oțel; Bețe de trekking (furnizate de utilizator); Altele
el: Τύπος συστήματος στύλου: Στύλοι αλουμινίου; Στύλοι από ανθρακονήματα; Στύλοι από fiberglass; Φουσκωτοί σωλήνες αέρα; Δεν απαιτούνται στύλοι; Ατσάλινοι στύλοι; Μπατόν πεζοπορίας (παρέχονται από τον χρήστη); Άλλο
vi: Loại hệ thống cột: Cọc nhôm; Cọc sợi carbon; Cọc sợi thủy tinh; Ống khí bơm hơi; Không cần cọc; Cọc thép; Gậy leo núi (người dùng tự chuẩn bị); Khác
zh-CN: 撑杆系统类型: 铝制杆; 碳纤维杆; 玻璃纤维杆; 充气管; 无需撑杆; 钢制杆; 登山杖（用户自备）; 其他
de: Stangensystemart: Aluminiumstangen; Carbonstangen; Fiberglasstangen; Aufblasbare Luftschläuche; Keine Stangen erforderlich; Stahlstangen; Trekkingstöcke (kundenseitig bereitzustellen); Sonstige
ko: 폴 시스템 유형: 알루미늄 폴; 탄소 섬유 폴; 유리 섬유 폴; 공기 주입식 튜브; 폴 불필요; 강철 폴; 트레킹 폴(사용자 제공); 기타
ja: ポールシステムタイプ: アルミニウムポール; カーボンファイバーポール; グラスファイバーポール; インフレータブルエアチューブ; ポール不要; スチールポール; トレッキングポール (お客様ご用意); その他
bg-BG: Тип система от пилони: Алуминиеви рейки; Карбонови рейки; Рейки от фибростъкло; Надуваеми въздушни тръби; Не са необходими рейки; Стоманени рейки; Туристически щеки (осигурени от потребителя); Други
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de varetas: Varas de alumínio; Varas de fibra de carbono; Varas de fibra de vidro; Tubos de ar insufláveis; Não requer varas; Varas de aço; Varas de caminhada (fornecidas pelo utilizador); Outro
sv: Typ av stångsystem: Stavar av aluminium; Kolfiberstavar; Glasfiberstavar; Uppblåsbara luftkanaler; Inga stavar krävs; Stålstavar; Vandringsstavar (medföljer ej); Annat
ru: Тип системы опор: Алюминиевые дуги; Карбоновые дуги; Стекловолоконные дуги; Надувные воздушные камеры; Дуги не требуются; Стальные дуги; Треккинговые палки (предоставляются пользователем); Другое
tr: Direk sistem tipi: Alüminyum direkler; Karbon fiber direkler; Fiberglas direkler; Şişirilebilir hava tüpleri; Direk gerekmez; Çelik direkler; Trekking batonları (kullanıcı tarafından sağlanır); Diğer
th: ระบบเสาแบบ: เสาอะลูมิเนียม; เสาคาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; เสาไฟเบอร์กลาส; ท่อลมแบบเป่าลม; ไม่ต้องใช้เสา; เสาเหล็ก; ไม้เท้าเดินป่า (ผู้ใช้จัดเตรียมเอง); อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di sistema del palo: Pali in alluminio; Pali in fibra di carbonio; Pali in fibra di vetro; Tubi ad aria gonfiabili; Nessun palo richiesto; Pali in acciaio; Bastoncini da trekking (forniti dall'utente); Altro
fr: Type de système de poteaux: Arceaux en aluminium; Arceaux en fibre de carbone; Arceaux en fibre de verre; Tubes à air gonflables; Aucun arceau requis; Arceaux en acier; Bâtons de trekking (fournis par l’utilisateur); Autre
pt-BR: Vareta, tipo de sistema: Varas de alumínio; Varas de fibra de carbono; Varas de fibra de vidro; Tubos de ar infláveis; Não requer varetas; Varetas de aço; Bastões de trekking (fornecidos pelo usuário); Outros